Washington statutes.
RCW 35.27.400

Fire limits—Parks.

Towns are hereby given the power to establish fire limits with proper regulations; to acquire by purchase or otherwise, lands for public parks within or without the limits of the town, and to improve the same.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.27.400. Prior: 1961 c 58 s 1; 1899 c 103 s 1; RRS s 9176.]